Missouri, session 2026, SB887.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.020, RSMo, is repealed and five
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
192.020, 192.026, 192.027, 192.028, and 376.1223, to read as
follows:
192.020. 1. It shall be the general duty and
responsibility of the department of health and senior
services to safeguard the health of the people in the state
and all its subdivisions. It shall make a study of the
causes and prevention of diseases. It shall designate those
diseases which are infectious, contagious, communicable or
dangerous in their nature and shall make and enforce
adequate orders, findings, rules and regulations to prevent
the spread of such diseases and to determine the prevalence
of such diseases within the state. It shall have power and
authority, with approval of the director of the department,
to make such orders, findings, rules and regulations as will
prevent the entrance of infectious, contagious and
communicable diseases into the state.
2. The department of health and senior services shall
include in its list of communicable or infectious diseases
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 887 2
which must be reported to the department methicillin-
resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA), carbapenem-resistant
enterobacteriaceae (CRE) as specified by the department,
[and] vancomycin-resistant enterococcus (VRE), and Lyme
disease.
192.026. 1. This section and sections 192.027,
192.028, and 376.1223 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Lyme Disease Eradication Act".
2. As used in this section and sections 192.027,
192.028, and 376.1223, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(2) "Lyme disease", a condition caused by an infection
of the bacterium Borrelia burgdorferi, Borrelia mayonii,
Borrelia afzelii, Borrelia garinii, Borrelia valaisiana,
Borrelia lusitaniae, Bartonella, Babesia, Ehrlichia, or
related species, transmitted to humans through the bite of
infected blacklegged ticks (Ixodes scapularis) or other
ticks, as diagnosed by the two-tier serologic testing
recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention (CDC) or by a similar blood test ordered by a
treating health care provider or by clinical evaluation;
(3) "Medically necessary", health care services or
products that a treating health care provider exercising
prudent clinical judgment would provide to a patient for the
purpose of preventing, evaluating, diagnosing, or treating
an illness, injury, disease, or symptoms of such, and that
are:
(a) Clinically appropriate in terms of type,
frequency, extent, site, and duration for the specific
circumstances; and

SB 887 3
(b) Not primarily for the mere convenience of the
patient, health care provider, or as determined by the
provider based on the patient's specific circumstances;
(4) "Posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome", a condition
characterized by persistent symptoms, including, but not
limited to, fatigue, pain, respiratory impairment,
neurological impairment, or other cognitive impairment
following standard antibiotic or other treatment for Lyme
disease.
3. Health care providers, laboratories, and local
health departments shall report to the department all
confirmed or suspected cases of Lyme disease within seven
days of diagnosis using standardized surveillance case
definitions developed by the CDC.
4. The department shall compile an annual report on
the incidence and prevalence of Lyme disease in Missouri,
including, but not limited to, demographic data, geographic
distribution, treatment outcomes, and barriers to care. The
department shall submit the report to the CDC and the
general assembly and make such report available to the
public on the department's website by no later than December
thirty-first of each year.
5. The department shall collaborate with the
University of Missouri or any public four-year institution
of higher education to integrate Lyme disease surveillance
data into existing tick-borne disease monitoring programs.
6. Any information collected or reported under this
section shall be done in a manner that protects individually
identifiable or potentially identifiable information and
that is consistent with state and federal privacy laws.
7. The department may promulgate any rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this

SB 887 4
section and section 192.027. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
192.027. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Lyme Research and Eradication Fund", which
shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general
assembly, as well as any grants, bequests, gifts, or
donations. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used
solely by the department for the purposes of implementing
the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
2. The department shall use the moneys in the fund to
distribute grants to public four-year institutions of higher
education, research institutions, and nonprofit

SB 887 5
organizations for Lyme disease research, including, but not
limited to, the following:
(1) Development of improved diagnostics, therapies,
and treatments;
(2) Studies on novel therapies, such as those inspired
by natural host immunity; and
(3) Eradication strategies, including, but not limited
to, tick population control through acaricides, deer
management programs, and environmental interventions.
3. The department shall prioritize grants based on
insurance claims data reported under subsection 5 of section
376.1223, with an emphasis on high incidence areas and
underserved populations. No less than twenty percent of the
funds shall be utilized to support eradication efforts in
rural counties.
4. The department shall submit a report to the general
assembly no later than March first of each year detailing
fund expenditures, research outcomes, and progress toward
Lyme disease eradication in the state.
192.028. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a health care provider shall not be subject to any
discipline, suspension or revocation of a license, or denial
of a license renewal solely for, within such provider's
scope of practice, prescribing, administering, or dispensing
treatments or therapies for Lyme disease or posttreatment
Lyme disease syndrome, including, but not limited to,
extended antibiotic therapy or similar treatment deemed
medically necessary.
376.1223. 1. As used in this section, the terms
"health carrier" and "health benefit plan" shall have the
same meanings as given to the terms under section 376.1350
and the terms "Lyme disease", "medically necessary", and

SB 887 6
"posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome" shall have the same
meanings as given to the terms under section 192.026.
2. Every health carrier or health benefit plan that
offers or issues health benefit plans that are delivered,
issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on
or after January 1, 2027, shall, at a minimum, provide
coverage for diagnostic testing, treatment, and management
of Lyme disease and posttreatment Lyme disease syndrome for
insured persons who receive a diagnosis from a licensed
health care provider acting within the scope of his or her
practice, including, but not limited to, the following when
deemed as medically necessary by the treating provider:
(1) Serologic testing, immunofluorescence antibody
testing, immunity testing, C6 Lyme enzyme immunoassay
testing, or other similar blood tests and clinical
evaluations conducted according to guidelines issued by the
federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
(2) Antibiotic therapy, including oral and intravenous
antibiotics, for a minimum of twenty-eight days for acute
Lyme disease and ninety days or longer for posttreatment
Lyme disease syndrome;
(3) Supportive therapies, including, but not limited
to, intravenous immunoglobulin, pain management, and
cognitive rehabilitation; and
(4) Holistic or herbal supplements and therapies.
3. The coverage described in subsection 2 of this
section shall be subject to the same deductibles,
coinsurance, and out-of-pocket maximums as apply to other
services covered under the health benefit plan for
nonpreventative services. No health carrier or health
benefit plan shall require prior authorization for any
testing, antibiotic therapy, or herbal therapy, but may

SB 887 7
require prior authorization for other medically necessary
services.
4. A health carrier or health benefit plan shall not:
(1) Deny or limit coverage for Lyme disease tests or
treatments based solely on guidelines issued by the
Infectious Disease Society of America that deem extended
antibiotic therapy to be experimental;
(2) Impose step therapy or fail-first requirements for
Lyme disease treatments that differ from those required for
similar infectious or chronic conditions; and
(3) Rescind coverage retroactively for Lyme disease-
related claims without evidence of fraud.
5. By July first of every year, each health carrier
and health benefit plan shall report to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance the number of Lyme
disease claims processed, denial rates, average duration of
treatment, and total expenditures for Lyme disease-related
care. The director shall compile and submit this data to
the general assembly and the department of health and senior
services to inform research priorities.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
supplemental insurance policy, including a life care
contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only,
Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy, short-
term major medical policies of six months' or less duration,
or any other supplemental policy as determined by the
director of the department of commerce and insurance.
✓